Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.330

Consent to service of process—Service, how made.

Every applicant for registration as a broker-dealer, investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or salesperson under this chapter, every issuer that files an application to register or files a claim of exemption from registration to offer a security in this state through any person acting on an agency basis in the common law sense, and every person filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.050 or 21.20.327 shall file with the director or with such person as the director may by rule or order designate, in such form as the director by rule prescribes, an irrevocable consent appointing the director or the director's successor in office to be the attorney of the applicant to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against the applicant or the applicant's successor, executor or administrator which arises under this chapter or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent. A person who has filed such a consent in connection with a previous registration, or notice filing pursuant to RCW 21.20.050 or 21.20.327, need not file another. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the director, but it is not effective unless (1) the plaintiff, who may be the director in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by him or her, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered mail to the defendant or respondent at the last address of the respondent or defendant on file with the director, and (2) the plaintiff's affidavit of compliance with this section is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

[ 1998 c 15 s 15; 1994 c 256 s 19; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 23; 1975 1st ex.s. c 84 s 19; 1959 c 282 s 33.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.